Nebraska, session 109, LB297.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 48-649.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-649.03 (1) Once benefits have been payable from and chargeable to an
employer's experience account throughout the preceding four calendar quarters
and wages for employment have been paid by the employer in each of the two
preceding four-calendar-quarter periods, the employer's combined tax rate shall
be calculated according to this section. The combined tax rate shall be based
upon the employer's experience rating record and determined from the employer's
reserve ratio.
(2) The employer's reserve ratio is the percent obtained by dividing (a)
the amount by which the employer's contributions credited from the time the
employer first or most recently became an employer, whichever date is later,
and up to and including September 30 of the year the rate computation is made,
plus any part of the employer's contributions due for that year paid on or
before October 31 of such year, exceed the employer's benefits charged during
the same period, by (b) the employer's average annual taxable payroll for the
sixteen-consecutive-calendar-quarter period ending September 30 of the year in
which the rate computation is made. For an employer with less than sixteen
consecutive calendar quarters of contribution experience, the employer's
average taxable payroll shall be determined based upon the four-calendar-
quarter periods for which contributions were payable.
(3) Each eligible experience rated employer shall be assigned to one of
twenty rate categories with a corresponding experience factor as follows:
Category Experience Factor
1 0.00
2 0.25
3 0.40
4 0.45
5 0.50
6 0.60
7 0.65
8 0.70
9 0.80
10 0.90
11 0.95
12 1.00
13 1.05
14 1.10
15 1.20
16 1.35
17 1.55
18 1.80
19 2.15
20 2.60
-1-

LB297 LB297
2025 2025
Eligible experience rated employers shall be assigned to rate categories
from highest to lowest according to their experience reserve ratio, with
category one assigned to accounts with the highest reserve ratios and category
twenty assigned to accounts with the lowest reserve ratios. Each category shall
be limited to no more than five percent of the state's total taxable payroll,
except that:
(a) Any employer with a portion of its taxable wages falling into two
consecutive categories shall be assigned to the lower category;
(b) No employer with a reserve ratio calculated to five decimal places
equal to the similarly calculated reserve ratio of another employer shall be
assigned to a higher rate than the employer to which it has the equal reserve
ratio; and
(c) No employer with a positive experience account balance shall be
assigned to category twenty.
(4) The state's reserve ratio shall be calculated annually by dividing the
amount available to pay benefits in the Unemployment Trust Fund and the State
Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund as of September 30, plus any amount of
combined tax owed by employers eligible for and electing annual payment status
for the four most recent quarters ending on September 30 in accordance with
rules and regulations adopted by the commissioner, by the state's total wages
for contributory employers from the four calendar quarters ending on September
30. For purposes of this section, total wages for contributory employers means
all remuneration paid by a contributory an employer in employment. The state's
reserve ratio shall be applied to the table in this subsection to determine the
yield factor for the upcoming rate year.
State's Reserve Ratio Yield Factor
1.75 percent and above = 0.50
1.60 percent up to but not including 1.75 = 0.60
1.45 percent up to but not including 1.60 = 0.70
1.30 percent up to but not including 1.45 = 0.75
1.15 percent up to but not including 1.30 = 0.80
1.00 percent up to but not including 1.15 = 0.90
0.85 percent up to but not including 1.00 = 1.00
0.70 percent up to but not including 0.85 = 1.10
0.60 percent up to but not including 0.70 = 1.20
0.50 percent up to but not including 0.60 = 1.25
0.45 percent up to but not including 0.50 = 1.30
0.40 percent up to but not including 0.45 = 1.35
0.35 percent up to but not including 0.40 = 1.40
0.30 percent up to but not including 0.35 = 1.45
Below 0.30 percent = 1.50
The commissioner may adjust the yield factor determined pursuant to the
preceding table to a lower scheduled yield factor if the state's reserve ratio
is 0.70 1.00 percent or greater. Once the yield factor for the upcoming rate
year has been determined, it is multiplied by the amount of unemployment
benefits paid from combined tax during the four calendar quarters ending
September 30 of the preceding year. The resulting figure is the planned yield
for the rate year. The planned yield is divided by the total taxable wages for
contributory employers for the four calendar quarters ending September 30 of
the previous year and carried to four decimal places to create the average
combined tax rate for the rate year. Beginning January 1, 2025, through
December 31, 2029, the final average combined tax rate shall be reduced by five
percent.
(5) Except in tax year 2025, the The average combined tax rate is assigned
to rate category twelve as established in subsection (3) of this section. In
tax year 2025 only, the category twelve rate shall be 0.48. Rates for each of
the remaining nineteen categories are determined by multiplying the average
combined tax rate by the experience factor associated with each category and
carried to four decimal places. Employers who are delinquent in filing their
combined tax reports as of October 31 of any year shall be assigned to category
twenty for the following calendar year unless the delinquency is corrected
prior to December 31 of the year of rate calculation.
(6) In addition to required contributions, an employer may make voluntary
contributions to the fund to be credited to his or her account. Voluntary
contributions by employers may be made up to the amount necessary to qualify
-2-

LB297 LB297
2025 2025
for one rate category reduction. Voluntary contributions received after
February 28 shall not be used in rate calculations for the same calendar year.
(7) As used in sections 48-648 to 48-654, the term payroll means the total
amount of wages during a calendar year, except as otherwise provided in section
48-654, by which the combined tax was measured.
Sec. 2. Original section 48-649.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-3-